lexc/num/enhunum1.lexc
LEXICON Case1marharom
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
!+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoezoa§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig

LEXICON Case2marharom
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoezoa§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig

LEXICON Submarharom
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Iadj:^+cIadj^i         #;  ! ra, re
+Kas:^+cKas^§oeanr§s     #;  !as,es,ös képző
                            #;


LEXICON AddNummarjnull
[stem]+Num[gcat]:0     Possmarjnull;
+Num:0     Plurmarjnull;
+Num:0     Fammarjnull;

LEXICON Possmarjnull
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Tmp:^+cTmp^sz§oeanr§r      Submarjnull;  ! szor, szer, ször
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Fammarjnull;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Fammarjnull;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§JPnull§§AE1§   Fammarjnull;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fammarjnull;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Fammarjnull;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§JPnull§§UUE1§k   Fammarjnull;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JPnull§§AE§im   Fammarjnull;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JPnull§§AE§id   Fammarjnull;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JPnull§§AE§i   Fammarjnull;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JPnull§§AE§ink   Fammarjnull;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JPnull§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fammarjnull;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JPnull§§AE§ik   Fammarjnull;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fammarjnull1;

LEXICON Plurmarjnull
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Genmarjnull;
                            Genmarjnull;
        
LEXICON Fammarjnull
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genmarjnull;
                       Genmarjnull;
LEXICON Fammarjnull1
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genmarjnull;
                       Genmarjnull1;

LEXICON Genmarjnull
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Casemarjnull;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Casemarjnull;
                       Casemarjnull;
LEXICON Genmarjnull1
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Casemarjnull;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Casemarjnull;
                       Casemarjnull1;
 
LEXICON Casemarjnull
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig

LEXICON Casemarjnull1
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoezoa§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig

LEXICON Submarjnull
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Iadj:^+cIadj^i         #;  ! ra, re
+Kas:^+cKas^§oeanr§s     #;  !as,es,ös képző
                            #;

! hét
LEXICON AddNummarhet
[stem]+Num[gcat]:0     Possmarhet;
+Num:0     Fammarhet;

LEXICON Possmarhet
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or           #;    ! kor
+Tmp:^+cTmp^sz§oeanr§r      Submarhet;  ! szor, szer, ször
                                  Genmar1het;

LEXICON Fammarhet
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genmarhet;
                       Genmar1het;

LEXICON Genmarhet
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Casemarhet;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Casemarhet;
                       Casemarhet;

LEXICON Genmar1het
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Casemarhet;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Casemarhet;
                       Case1marhet;
 
LEXICON Casemarhet
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig

LEXICON Num
négy AddNummarjnull; 
hét AddNummarhet; 
